Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1127
Dentists; name of associate; duty to display.

Every person who owns, operates, or controls a dental office in which anyone other than himself or herself is practicing dentistry, shall display the name of such person or persons in a conspicuous place at the public entrance to such office.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 88, p. 478;

C.S.1929, § 71-1207;

R.S.1943, § 71-189;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-189;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 460.